Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3607
Commercial channels, defined.

Commercial channels shall mean the sale of corn for any use, to any commercial buyer, dealer, processor, cooperative, or to any person, public or private, who resells any corn or product produced from corn.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 7.